Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB630.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "department" in section 4602 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Department." The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services of the Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 4603(a)(2) of Title 23 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 4603. Relatives' liability; procedure.12345678910111213141516171819 (a) Liability.--* * *(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply in any of the following cases:* * *(iii) An individual who is 18 years of age or older and who is the child of an indigent person shall not be liable for the support of the indigent person if the indigent person has not had contact with the individual for a period of 10 years before the need for support.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0630PN0623 - 2 - 123456789101112